Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.08.120

Authentication of charter.

The authentication of the charter shall be by certificate of the mayor in substance as follows:

"I, . . . . . ., mayor of the city of . . . . . ., do hereby certify that in accordance with the provisions of the Constitution and statutes of the state of Washington, the city of . . . . . . caused fifteen freeholders to be elected on the . . . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . . . as a charter commission to prepare a charter for the city; that due notice of that election was given in the manner provided by law and that the following persons were declared elected to prepare and propose a charter for the city, to wit:

That thereafter on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . . . the charter commission returned a proposed charter for the city of . . . . . . signed by the following members thereof: . . . . . .

That thereafter the proposed charter was published in . . . . . . . . . (indicate name of newspaper in which published), for at least once each week for four weeks next preceding the day of submitting the same to the electors for their approval.

(Indicate dates of publication.)

That thereafter on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . . ., at an election duly called and held, the proposed charter was submitted to the qualified electors thereof, and the returns canvassed resulting as follows: For the proposed charter . . . . votes; against the proposed charter, . . . . votes; majority for the proposed charter, . . . . votes; whereupon the charter was declared adopted by a majority of the qualified electors voting at the election.

I further certify that the foregoing is a full, true and complete copy of the proposed charter so voted upon and adopted as aforesaid.

IN TESTIMONY WHEREOF, I hereunto set my hand and affix the corporate seal of the said city at my office this . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . . .

. . . .

Mayor of the city of . . . .

Attest:

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

Clerk of the city of . . . . . . (corporate seal)."

Immediately after authentication, the authenticated charter shall be recorded by the city clerk in a book provided for that purpose known as the charter book of the city of . . . . . . and when so recorded shall be attested by the clerk and mayor under the corporate seal of the city. All amendments shall be in like manner recorded and attested.

All courts shall take judicial notice of a charter and all amendments thereto when recorded and attested as required in this section.

[ 2016 c 202 s 28; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.08.120.]